Utah statutes.
53B-2-108.   Appropriations reallocation for 2002-2003 fiscal year.
(1)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary
Procedures Act, appropriations for the support of higher education for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002 and ending June 30, 2003, may be
reallocated between line items as provided in this section.
(2) (a)  The president of the University of Utah may reallocate between line
items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 141-149 in S.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(ii)  as modified by supplemental appropriations, including H.B. 4001, 2002
Fourth Special Session and H.B. 5009, 2002 Fifth Special Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in the supplemental appropriations.
(3) (a)  The president of Utah State University may reallocate between line
items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 150-159 in S.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(ii)  as modified by supplemental appropriations, including H.B. 4001, 2002
Fourth Special Session and H.B. 5009, 2002 Fifth Special Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in the supplemental appropriations.
(4) (a)  The president of Weber State University may reallocate between line
items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 160 and 161 in S.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(ii)  as modified by supplemental appropriations, including H.B. 4001, 2002
Fourth Special Session and H.B. 5009, 2002 Fifth Special Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in the supplemental appropriations.
(5) (a)  The president of Southern Utah University may reallocate between line
items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 162-164 in S.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(ii)  as modified by supplemental appropriations, including H.B. 5009, 2002
Fifth Special Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in the supplemental appropriations.
(6) (a)  The president of Snow College may reallocate between line items the
appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 165-167 in S.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(ii)  as modified by supplemental appropriations, including H.B. 5009, 2002
Fifth Special Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in the supplemental appropriations.
(7) (a)  The president of Dixie State College may reallocate between line
items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 168-170 in S.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(ii)  as modified by supplemental appropriations, including H.B. 5009, 2002
Fifth Special Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in the supplemental appropriations.
(8) (a)  The president of the College of Eastern Utah may reallocate between
line items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 171-174 in S.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(ii)  as modified by supplemental appropriations, including H.B. 5009, 2002
Fifth Special Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in the supplemental appropriations.
(9) (a)  The president of Utah Valley State College may reallocate between
line items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 175 and 176 in S.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(ii)  as modified by supplemental appropriations, including H.B. 5009, 2002
Fifth Special Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in the supplemental appropriations.
(10) (a)  The president of Salt Lake Community College may reallocate between
line items the appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 177-179 in S.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(ii)  as modified by supplemental appropriations, including H.B. 5009, 2002
Fifth Special Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in the supplemental appropriations.
(11) (a)  The State Board of Regents may reallocate between line items the
appropriations:
(i)  described in Items 180-189 in S.B. 1, 2002 General Session; and
(ii)  as modified by supplemental appropriations, including H.B. 5009, 2002
Fifth Special Session.
(b)  The total amount of money reallocated may not exceed the sum of the
reductions made in the supplemental appropriations.
